Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2700.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Technology first study committee; membership; duties; report; delayed repeal A. The technology first study committee is established consisting of the following members who have knowledge in assistive technology and who are appointed by the following: 1. The president of the senate: (a) Two members who represent the department of economic security, one of whom represents the division of developmental disabilities and one of whom represents the vocational rehabilitation community program. (b) One member of the developmental disabilities advisory council. (c) One member of the developmental disabilities planning council. (d) One member who represents the department of education. (e) One member who represents the Arizona health care cost containment system. (f) One member who represents northern Arizona university's institute for human development. 2. The speaker of the house of representatives: (a) One member who represents the university of Arizona's Sonoran center for excellence in disabilities. (b) One member who represents the Arizona assistive technology access program. (c) One member who represents disability rights Arizona. (d) Two members who represent use assistive technology. (e) Two members who represent parent advocate groups. (f) One member who represents the delegation for developmental disability advocacy, also known as 3DA. B. The study committee shall meet two times per year at dates and times to be decided by the study committee. C. Committee members are not eligible to receive compensation, but members appointed pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 2, subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e) and (f) are eligible for reimbursement of expenses under title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. D. The study committee shall: 1. Study and address specific issues related to assistive technology, including technology first initiatives. 2. Analyze emerging assistive technologies. 3. Identify potential changes in assistive technologies. 4. Analyze how to better serve individuals with assistive technology needs. 5. On or before October 1, 2027, submit a report regarding the committee's activities and recommendations to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. F. This section is repealed from and after October 1, 2027. Sec. 2.2. Legislative intent and purpose A. The legislature intends that the vision of the technology first study committee is to: 1. Increase assistive technology awareness. 2. Identify technological solutions. 3. Facilitate assistive technology access for all Arizonans with developmental disabilities. B. The purpose of the technology first study committee is to discover and recommend systemic changes regarding assistive technology and other technological solutions to better serve individuals with disabilities across Arizona. Sec. 3.3. Short title This act may be cited as the "Technology First Study Committee". APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.